California statutes. Education Code
 internet website exists, pursuant to Section 1415(d)(1)(B) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(4) The contents of the procedural safeguards notice shall contain the requirements listed in Section 1415(d)(2) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.504(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) Child find data collected pursuant to this chapter, or collected pursuant to a regulation or an interagency agreement, are subject to the confidentiality requirements of Sections 300.610 to 300.627, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 579, Sec. 3.   (SB 373)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56302.

A local educational agency shall provide for the identification and assessment of the exceptional needs of an individual, and the planning of an instructional program to meet the assessed needs. Identification procedures shall include systematic methods of utilizing referrals of pupils from teachers, parents, agencies, appropriate professional persons, and from other members of the public. Identification procedures shall be coordinated with schoolsite procedures for referral of pupils with needs that cannot be met with modification of the regular instructional program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56302.1.

(a) Once a child has been referred for an initial assessment to determine whether the child is an individual with exceptional needs as defined in Section 56026 and to determine the educational needs of the child, these determinations shall be made, and an individualized education program meeting shall occur, within 60 days of receiving parental consent for the assessment in accordance with subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) The 60-day time period does not apply to a local educational agency if either of the following occurs:

(1) A child enrolls in a school served by the local educational agency after the relevant time period has commenced but prior to a determination by his or her previous local educational agency of whether the child is an individual with exceptional needs. The exemption of this paragraph applies only if the subsequent local educational agency is making sufficient progress to ensure a prompt completion of the assessment, and the parent and subsequent local educational agency agree to a specific date by which the assessment shall be completed.

(2) The parent of a child repeatedly fails or refuses to produce the child for the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 16.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56302.5.

The term “assessment,” as used in this chapter, shall have the same meaning as the term “evaluation” in the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as provided in Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56303.

A pupil shall be referred for special educational instruction and services only after the resources of the regular education program have been considered and, where appropriate, utilized.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56304.

(a) The parents or guardians of a pupil who has been referred for initial assessment, or of a pupil identified as an individual with exceptional needs, shall be afforded an opportunity to participate in meetings with respect to the identification, assessment, and educational placement, pursuant to Section 56342.5 and subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 56341.5, of the pupil and with respect to the provision of a free appropriate public education, as provided in Section 300.501 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) In accordance with subsection (f) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, when conducting individualized education program meetings and placement meetings pursuant to this part, and when carrying out administrative matters under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500), including scheduling exchange of witness lists and status conferences, the parent of an individual with exceptional needs and a local educational agency may agree to use alternative means of meeting participation, such as video conferences and conference calls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 17.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56305.

(a) On or before July 1, 2019, the department shall develop a manual providing guidance to local educational agencies on identifying English learners as individuals with exceptional needs, classifying individuals with exceptional needs as English learners, supporting pupils who are both English learners and individuals with exceptional needs, and determining when such dually identified pupils should be either removed from classification as English learners or exited from special education.

(b) The goal of the manual shall be to provide guidance, for voluntary use by local educational agencies, charter schools, and the state special schools, on evidence-based and promising practices for the identification, assessment, support, and reclassification of these pupils and
 to promote a collaborative approach among general education teachers, special education teachers, school administrators, paraprofessionals, other involved personnel, and parents in determining the most appropriate academic placements and services for these pupils.

(c) In developing the manual, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Review manuals and other resources produced on this topic by local educational agencies, special education administrators, other organizations, other states, and the federal government.

(2) Establish and consult with a stakeholder group comprised of experts and practitioners. These individuals shall have expertise or experience in either special education, English learner education, or in both.

(d) The manual
 shall include all of the following topics:

(1) Guidance for accurately identifying English learners suspected of being individuals with exceptional needs and accurately classifying individuals with exceptional needs as English learners, including guidance on avoiding overidentification and underidentification of these pupils for special education services and in different disability categories and in different grade spans.

(2) Information on second language acquisition and progress, including guidance on distinguishing between language acquisition and disabilities.

(3) Examples of prereferral strategies, early interventions, and early intervening strategies specifically addressing the needs of English learners, including examples of early interventions for pupils in preschool and the primary grades who are acquiring
 foundational language and literacy skills.

(4) Guidance on referral processes.

(5) Guidance on the use of assessments, including the use of multiple measures as well as assessment accommodations for both language and disability, including assessment accommodations in primary languages.

(6) Guidance on the consideration of extrinsic factors, such as vision, hearing, and health, in the identification of pupils.

(7) Guidance on the development of individualized education programs for English learners, including the composition of individualized education program teams.

(8) Guidance on how to support the language and content learning needs of English learners who are individuals with
 exceptional needs, including how to do so in the least restrictive environment, as described in Section 56040.1, and in a manner that enables access to the core curriculum.

(9) Guidance regarding placement or continued placement in bilingual programs and on providing services and instruction in primary languages.

(10) Guidance on special education exit and English learner reclassification processes for English learners who are individuals with exceptional needs.

(11) Information on the role of culture and acculturation, to the extent it is related to the process of identifying English learners for special education services.

(12) Guidance for working with families, including guidance on meeting the needs of nonnative English speaking parents, guardians,
 and educational rights holders in special education proceedings.

(13) Examples of any plans or processes used by local educational agencies for continuous evaluation and systemic review and guidance on sharing information between special education and English learner programs within local educational agencies for the purpose of tracking effectiveness, to the extent permitted under state and federal law regarding the privacy of pupil information.

(14) State and federal law, regulations, and guidance related to the rights of English learners and individuals with exceptional needs.

(e) All guidance in the manual shall be consistent with state and federal law, regulations, and guidance regarding English learners and special education.

(f) The manual shall
 be written for ease of use by educators. The department is encouraged to incorporate features such as flowcharts, checklists, sample forms, and case examples.

(g) The department shall post the manual on its Internet Web site and on its professional development Internet Web site.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “English learners” has the same definition as in subdivision (a) of Section 435.

(2) “Individuals with exceptional needs” has the same definition as in Section 56026.

(3) “Reclassification,” with respect to an English learner, means the procedures described in Section 11303 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(i) (1) (A) In implementing this section, the department, with input from the stakeholder group, shall develop a plan for the dissemination of the manual and the means of providing professional development on the content of the manual. The plan shall address how the state and local educational agencies can collaborate in meeting both of these objectives in a cost-effective manner.

(B) Implementation of the plan developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be contingent upon an appropriation for that purpose in the annual Budget Act or another enacted statute.

(2) The plan shall be submitted to the state board, the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the Advisory Commission on Special Education, and
 the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before July 1, 2019.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section be funded with federal funds, to the extent permissible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 13.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessment [56320. - 56330.]

56320.

Before any action is taken with respect to the initial placement of an individual with exceptional needs in special education instruction, an individual assessment of the pupil’s educational needs shall be conducted, by qualified persons, in accordance with requirements including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Testing and assessment materials and procedures used for the purposes of assessment and placement of individuals with exceptional needs are selected and administered so as not to be racially, culturally, or sexually discriminatory. Pursuant to Section 1412(a)(6)(B) of Title 20 of the United States Code, the materials and procedures shall be provided in the pupil’s native language or mode of communication, unless it is clearly not feasible to do so.

(b) Tests and other assessment materials meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Are provided and administered in the language and form most likely to yield accurate information on what the pupil knows and can do academically, developmentally, and functionally, unless it is not feasible to so provide or administer as required by Section 1414(b)(3)(A)(ii) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) Are used for purposes for which the assessments or measures are valid and reliable.

(3) Are administered by trained and knowledgeable personnel and are administered in accordance with any instructions provided by the producer of the assessments, except that individually administered tests of intellectual or emotional functioning shall be administered by a credentialed school psychologist.

(c) Tests and other assessment materials include those tailored to assess specific areas of educational need and not merely those that are designed to provide a single general intelligence quotient.

(d) Tests are selected and administered to best ensure that when a test administered to a pupil with impaired sensory, manual, or speaking skills produces test results that accurately reflect the pupil’s aptitude, achievement level, or any other factors the test purports to measure and not the pupil’s impaired sensory, manual, or speaking skills unless those skills are the factors the test purports to measure.

(e) Pursuant to Section 1414(b)(2)(B) of Title 20 of the United States Code, no single measure or assessment is used as the sole criterion for determining whether a pupil is an individual with exceptional needs or determining an appropriate educational program for the pupil.

(f) The pupil is assessed in all areas related to the suspected disability including, if appropriate, health and development, vision, including low vision, hearing, motor abilities, language function, general intelligence, academic performance, communicative status, self-help, orientation and mobility skills, career and vocational abilities and interests, and social and emotional status. A developmental history shall be obtained, when appropriate. For pupils with residual vision, a low vision assessment shall be provided in accordance with guidelines established pursuant to Section 56136. In assessing each pupil under this article, the assessment shall be conducted in accordance with Sections 300.304 and 300.305 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) The assessment of a pupil, including the assessment of a pupil with a suspected low incidence disability, shall be conducted by persons knowledgeable of that disability. Special attention shall be given to the unique educational needs, including, but not limited to, skills and the need for specialized services, materials, and equipment consistent with guidelines established pursuant to Section 56136.

(h) As part of an initial assessment, if appropriate, and as part of any reassessment under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and this part, the group that includes members of the individualized education program team, and other qualified professionals, as appropriate, shall follow the procedures specified in Section 1414(c) of Title 20 of the United States Code. The group may conduct its review without a meeting.

(i) Each local educational agency shall ensure that assessments of individuals with exceptional needs who transfer from one district to another district in the same academic year are coordinated with the individual’s prior and subsequent schools, as necessary and as expeditiously as possible, in accordance with Section 1414(b)(3)(D) of Title 20 of the United States Code, to ensure prompt completion of the full assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56320.1.

All identification, evaluation, and assessment procedures for individuals with exceptional needs who are younger than three years of age shall be provided pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425) and the California Early Intervention Services Act, Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 14.4.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56321.

(a) If an assessment for the development or revision of the individualized education program is to be conducted, the parent or guardian of the pupil shall be given, in writing, a proposed assessment plan within 15 days of the referral for assessment not counting days between the pupil’s regular school sessions or terms or days of school vacation in excess of five schooldays from the date of receipt of the referral, unless the parent or guardian agrees, in writing, to an extension. However, in any event, the assessment plan shall be developed within 10 days after the commencement of the subsequent regular school year or the pupil’s regular school term as determined by each district’s school calendar for each pupil for whom a referral has been made 10 days or less prior to the end of the regular school year. In the case of pupil school vacations, the 15-day time shall recommence on the date that the pupil’s regular schooldays reconvene. A copy of the notice of a parent’s or guardian’s rights shall be attached to the assessment plan. A written explanation of all the procedural safeguards under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and the rights and procedures contained in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500), shall be included in the notice of a parent’s or guardian’s rights, including information on the procedures for requesting an informal meeting, prehearing mediation conference, mediation conference, or due process hearing; the timelines for completing each process; whether the process is optional; and the type of representative who may be invited to participate.

(b) The proposed assessment plan given to parents or guardians shall meet all the following requirements:

(1) Be in language easily understood by the general public.

(2) Be provided in the native language of the parent or guardian or other mode of communication used by the parent or guardian, unless to do so is clearly not feasible.

(3) Explain the types of assessments to be conducted.

(4) State that no individualized education program will result from the assessment without the consent of the parent.

(c) (1) The local educational agency proposing to conduct an initial assessment to determine if the child qualifies as an individual with exceptional needs shall make reasonable efforts to obtain informed consent from the parent of the child before conducting the assessment, in accordance with Section 1414(a)(1)(D) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) If the parent of the child does not provide consent for an initial assessment, or the parent fails to respond to a request to provide the consent, the local educational agency may, but is not required to, pursue the initial assessment utilizing the procedures described in Section 1415 of Title 20 of the United States Code and in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 56501 and subdivision (e) of Section 56506.

(3) In accordance with Section 300.300(a)(3)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the local educational agency does not violate its obligation under Section 300.111 and Sections 300.301 to 300.311, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations if it declines to pursue the assessment.

(4) The parent or guardian shall have at least 15 days from the receipt of the proposed assessment plan to arrive at a decision. The assessment may begin immediately upon receipt of the consent.

(d) Consent for initial assessment shall not be construed as consent for initial placement or initial provision of special education and related services to an individual with exceptional needs, pursuant to Section 1414(a)(1)(D)(i)(I) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(e) In accordance with Section 300.300(d)(1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, parental consent is not required before reviewing existing data as part of an assessment or reassessment, or before administering a test or other assessment that is administered to all children, unless before administration of that test or assessment, consent is required of the parents of all the children.

(f) Pursuant to Section 1414(a)(1)(E) of Title 20 of the United States Code, the screening of a pupil by a teacher or specialist to determine appropriate instructional strategies for curriculum implementation shall not be considered to be an assessment for eligibility for special education and related services.

(g) In accordance with Section 300.300(d)(5) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to meet the reasonable efforts requirement in subdivision (c), the local educational agency shall document its attempts to obtain parental consent using the procedures in subdivision (h) of Section 56341.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 15.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56321.1.

If the child is a ward of the state and is not residing with his or her parent, the agency shall, pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, make reasonable efforts to obtain the informed consent from the parent, as defined in Section 56028, of the child for an initial assessment to determine whether the child is an individual with exceptional needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 20.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56321.5.

The copy of the notice of parent rights shall include the right to electronically record the proceedings of individualized education program team meetings as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 56341.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56321.6.

The copy of the notice of parent rights shall include information regarding the state special schools for pupils who are deaf, hard of hearing, blind, visually impaired, or deaf-blind.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56322.

The assessment shall be conducted by persons competent to perform the assessment, as determined by the local educational agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56323.

Admission of a pupil to special education instruction shall be made only in accordance with this article, Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 56333) and standards established by the board and upon a recommendation by the individualized education program team.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56324.

(a) Any psychological assessment of pupils shall be made in accordance with Section 56320 and shall be conducted by a credentialed school psychologist who is trained and prepared to assess cultural and ethnic factors appropriate to the pupil being assessed.

(b) Any health assessment of pupils shall be made in accordance with Section 56320 and shall be conducted by a credentialed school nurse or physician who is trained and prepared to assess cultural and ethnic factors appropriate to the pupil being assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1353, Sec. 53.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56325.

(a) (1) As required by subclause (I) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the following shall apply to special education programs for individuals with exceptional needs who transfer from district to district within the state. In the case of an individual with exceptional needs who has an individualized education program and transfers into a district from a district not operating programs under the same local plan in which the individual with exceptional needs was last enrolled in a special education program within the same academic year, the local educational agency shall provide the pupil with a free appropriate public education,
 including services comparable to those described in the previously approved individualized education program, in consultation with the parents, for a period not to exceed 30 days, by which time the local educational agency shall adopt the previously approved individualized education program or shall develop, adopt, and implement a new individualized education program that is consistent with federal and state law.

(2) In the case of an individual with exceptional needs who has an individualized education program and transfers into a district from a district operating programs under the same special education local plan area of the district in which the individual with exceptional needs was last enrolled in a special education program within the same academic year, the new district shall continue, without delay, to provide services
 comparable to those described in the existing approved individualized education program, unless the parent and the local educational agency agree to develop, adopt, and implement a new individualized education program that is consistent with federal and state law.

(3) (A) As required by subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the following shall apply to special education programs for individuals with exceptional needs who transfer from an educational agency located outside the State of California to a district within California. In the case of an individual with exceptional needs who transfers from district to district within the same academic year, the local educational agency shall provide the pupil with a free
 appropriate public education, including services comparable to those described in the previously approved individualized education program, in consultation with the parents, until the local educational agency conducts an assessment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, if determined to be necessary by the local educational agency, and develops a new individualized education program, if appropriate, that is consistent with federal and state law.

(B) (i) For purposes of subparagraph (A), a local educational agency shall, within 30
 days of receipt of official or unofficial records, either adopt and implement the individualized education program previously adopted for the pupil or develop, adopt, and implement a new individualized education program for the pupil that is consistent with federal and state law, if applicable.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), “unofficial records” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (A) of Article IV of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children, as specified in Section 49701.

(b) (1) To facilitate the transition for an individual with exceptional needs described in subdivision (a), the new school in which the individual
 with exceptional needs enrolls shall take reasonable steps to promptly obtain the pupil’s records, including the individualized education program and supporting documents and any other records relating to the provision of special education and related services to the pupil, from the previous school in which the pupil was enrolled, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 99.31 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations and consistent with the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children, as specified in subdivision (A) of Article I, subdivision (E) of Article II, and subdivisions (B) and (C) of Article V of Section 49701, as applicable.

(2) The previous school in which the individual with exceptional needs was enrolled shall take reasonable steps to promptly respond to the request from the new school.

(3) The new school in which the individual with exceptional needs enrolls shall accept
 unofficial records provided by the pupil’s parent or guardian pending validation by the official records, consistent with the requirements of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children, as specified in subdivision (A) of Article I, subdivision (E) of Article II, and subdivisions (B) and (C) of Article V of Section 49701, as applicable.

(c) If whenever a pupil described in subdivision (a) was placed and residing in a residential nonpublic, nonsectarian school, prior to transferring to a district in another special education local plan area, and this
 placement is not eligible for funding pursuant to Section 56836.165, the special education local plan area that contains the district that made the residential nonpublic, nonsectarian school placement is responsible for the funding of the placement, including related services, for the remainder of the school year. An extended year session is included in the school year in which the session ends.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 453, Sec. 2.   (AB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56326.

A pupil may be referred, as appropriate, for further assessment and recommendations to the California Schools for the Deaf or Blind or the Diagnostic Centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 30.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

56326.5.

(a) The department’s Deaf and Hard of Hearing unit and the California School for the Deaf shall jointly select language developmental milestones from
 existing standardized norms, pursuant to the process specified in subdivision (d), for purposes of developing a resource for use by parents to monitor and track deaf and hard-of-hearing children’s expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy. This parent resource shall:

(1) Include the language developmental milestones selected pursuant to the process specified in subdivision (d).

(2) Be appropriate for use, in both content and administration, with deaf and hard-of-hearing children from birth to five years of age, inclusive, who use both or one of the languages of American Sign Language (ASL) and English. For purposes of this section, “English” includes spoken English, written English, or English with the use of
 visual supplements.

(3) Present the developmental milestones in terms of typical development of all children, by age range.

(4) Be written for clarity and ease of use by parents.

(5) Be aligned to the department’s existing infant, toddler, and preschool guidelines, the existing instrument used to assess the development of children with disabilities pursuant to federal law, and state standards in English language arts.

(6) Make clear that the parent resource is not a formal assessment of language and literacy development, and that a parent’s observations of their children may differ from formal assessment data presented at an individualized family service plan (IFSP)
 or individualized education program (IEP) meeting.

(7) Make clear that a parent may bring the parent resource to an IFSP or IEP meeting for purposes of sharing their observations about their child’s development.

(b) The department shall also select existing tools or assessments for educators that can be used to assess the language and literacy development of deaf and hard-of-hearing children.
 These educator tools or assessments:

(1) Shall be in a format that shows stages of language development.

(2) Shall be selected for use by educators to track the development of deaf and hard-of-hearing children’s expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy.

(3) Shall be
 selected from existing instruments or assessments used to assess the development of all children from birth to five years of age, inclusive.

(4) Shall be appropriate, in both content and administration, for use with deaf and hard-of-hearing children.

(5) May be used, in addition to the assessment required by federal law, by the child’s IFSP or IEP team, as applicable, to track deaf and hard-of-hearing children’s progress, and to establish or modify IFSP or IEP plans.

(6) May reflect the recommendations of the advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(c) (1) The department shall disseminate the parent resource developed pursuant to subdivision (a) to parents and guardians of deaf and hard-of-hearing children, and, pursuant to federal law, shall disseminate the educator tools and assessments selected pursuant to subdivision (b) to local educational agencies for use in the development and modification of IFSP and IEP plans, and shall provide
 materials and training on its use, to assist deaf and hard-of-hearing children in becoming linguistically ready for kindergarten using both or one of the languages of ASL and English.

(2) If a deaf or hard-of-hearing child does not demonstrate progress in expressive and receptive language skills, as measured by one of the educator tools or assessments selected pursuant to subdivision (b), or by the existing instrument used to assess the development of children with disabilities
 pursuant to federal law, the child’s IFSP or IEP team, as applicable, shall, as part of the process required by federal law, explain in detail the reasons why the child is not meeting the language developmental milestones or progressing towards them, and shall recommend specific strategies, services, and programs that shall be provided to assist the child’s success toward English literacy.

(d) (1) On or before March 1, 2017, the department shall provide the advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (e) with a list of existing language developmental milestones from existing standardized norms, along with any relevant information
 held by the department regarding those language developmental milestones for possible inclusion in the parent resource developed pursuant to subdivision (a). These language developmental milestones shall be aligned to the department’s existing infant, toddler, and preschool guidelines, the existing instrument used to assess the development of children with disabilities pursuant to federal law, and the state standards in English language arts.

(2) On or before June 1, 2017, the advisory committee shall recommend language developmental milestones for selection pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) On or
 before June 30, 2017, the department shall inform the advisory committee of which language developmental milestones were selected.

(e) (1) The Superintendent shall establish an ad hoc advisory committee for purposes of soliciting input from experts on the selection of language developmental milestones for children who are deaf or hard of hearing that are equivalent to those for children who are not deaf or hard of hearing, for inclusion in the parent resource developed pursuant to subdivision (a). The advisory committee may also make recommendations on the
 selection and administration of the educator tools or assessments selected pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The advisory committee shall consist of 13 volunteers, the majority of whom shall be deaf or hard of hearing, and all of whom shall be within the field of education for the deaf and hard of hearing. The advisory committee shall include all of the following:

(A) One parent of a child who is deaf or hard of hearing who uses the dual languages of ASL and English.

(B) One parent of a child who is deaf
 or hard of hearing who uses only spoken English, with or without visual supplements.

(C) One credentialed teacher of deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils who use the dual languages of ASL and English.

(D) One credentialed teacher of deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils from a state certified nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(E) One expert who researches language outcomes for deaf and hard-of-hearing children using ASL and English.

(F) One expert who researches language outcomes for deaf and hard-of-hearing children using spoken English, with or without visual supplements.

(G) One credentialed teacher of deaf and
 hard-of-hearing pupils whose expertise is in curriculum and instruction in ASL and English.

(H) One credentialed teacher of deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils whose expertise is in curriculum and instruction in spoken English, with or without visual supplements.

(I) One advocate for the teaching and use of the dual languages of ASL and English.

(J) One advocate for the teaching and use of spoken English, with or without visual supplements.

(K) One early intervention specialist who works with deaf and hard-of-hearing infants and toddlers using the dual languages of ASL and English.

(L) One
 credentialed teacher of deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils whose expertise is in ASL and English language assessment.

(M) One speech pathologist from spoken English, with or without the use of visual supplements.

(f) The advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (e) may also advise the department or its contractor on the content and administration of the existing instrument used to assess the development of children with disabilities pursuant to federal law, as used to assess deaf and hard-of-hearing children’s language and literacy development to ensure the appropriate use of that instrument with those children, and may make recommendations regarding future research to improve the measurement of progress of deaf and hard-of-hearing children in language and literacy.

(g) Commencing on or before July 31, 2017, and on or before each July 31 thereafter, the department shall annually produce a report, using existing data reported in compliance with the federally required state performance plan on pupils with disabilities, that is specific to language and literacy development of deaf and hard-of-hearing children from birth to five years of age, inclusive, including those who are deaf or hard of hearing and have other disabilities, relative to their peers who are not deaf or hard of hearing. The department shall make this report available on its Internet Web site.

(h) All activities of the department in implementing this section shall be consistent with federal law regarding the education of children with disabilities and federal law regarding the
 privacy of pupil information.

(i) For the purpose of this section, the term “language developmental milestones” means milestones of development aligned with the existing state instrument used to meet the requirements of federal law for the assessment of children from birth to five years of age, inclusive.

(j) This section shall apply only
 to children from birth to five years of age, inclusive.

(k) Implementation of this section is subject to an appropriation being made for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.   (SB 210)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

56327.

The personnel who assess the pupil shall prepare a written report, or reports, as appropriate, of the results of each assessment. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all the following:

(a) Whether the pupil may need special education and related services.

(b) The basis for making the determination.

(c) The relevant behavior noted during the observation of the pupil in an appropriate setting.
